Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-832
Act, purpose.

The purpose of the Pacific Conflict Stress Test Act is to prepare and secure the State of Nebraska in order to minimize the disruptive impact of a potential conflict precipitated by foreign adversaries against allies, democratic countries, and the United States Armed Forces in the Pacific theater.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 2.
April 17, 2024